Maryland, session 2025, HB0647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–601.1.
(a) In this section, “restrictive housing” has the meaning stated in § 9–614 of this
subtitle.
(b) Except as provided in this section, a pregnant incarcerated individual may not
be involuntarily placed in restrictive housing, including involuntary medical isolation or
infirmary.
(c) (1) A pregnant incarcerated individual may be involuntarily placed in
restrictive housing if the managing official of the correctional facility, in consultation with
the person overseeing women’s health and services in the facility, makes an individualized
and written determination that restrictive housing is required as a temporary response to:
(i) behavior that poses:
1. a serious and immediate risk of physical harm to the
incarcerated individual or another; or
2. an immediate and credible flight risk that cannot be
reasonably prevented by other means; or
(ii) a situation that poses a risk of spreading a communicable disease
that cannot be reasonably mitigated by other means.
(2) A managing official who makes a determination described in paragraph
(1) of this subsection shall document the reason why other less restrictive housing is not
possible.
(3) The determination described in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
be reviewed and affirmed at least every 24 hours in writing with a copy provided to the
incarcerated individual.
(d) An individual placed in restrictive housing under this section shall be:
(1) medically assessed every 8 hours;
(2) housed only in the least restrictive setting consistent with the health
and safety of the individual; and
(3) given an intensive treatment plan developed and approved by the
person overseeing women’s health and services in the facility.

HOUSE BILL 647 3
(e) (1) A pregnant incarcerated individual who is deemed to need infirmary
care shall be admitted to the infirmary on order of a primary care nurse practitioner or
obstetrician.
(2) If the incarcerated individual is overdue in the pregnancy, the
incarcerated individual shall be housed in the infirmary as an admitted patient until labor
begins or until the obstetrical consultant has made other housing and care
recommendations.
(3) A pregnant incarcerated individual who has been placed in the
infirmary shall be provided:
(i) access to regular outside recreation consistent with the general
population;
(ii) access to visits, mail, and telephone consistent with general
population privileges; and
(iii) the ability to continue to participate in work detail,
programming, and classes.
(f) (1) Within 48 hours after confirmation by a health care professional that
an incarcerated individual is pregnant, the incarcerated individual shall be notified in
writing of the restrictions on a pregnant incarcerated individual being placed in restrictive
housing provided in this section.
(2) The Secretary shall establish a process through which an incarcerated
individual may report a violation of this section.
(g) The managing official of a correctional facility who authorized the placement
of a pregnant incarcerated individual in restrictive housing shall submit within 30 days of
the placement a report in writing to the Commissioner of Correction, the Commissioner of
Pretrial Detention and Services, and the person overseeing women’s health and services in
the facility that describes the facts and circumstances surrounding the placement,
including:
(1) the reasoning for the determination to place the incarcerated individual
in restrictive housing;
(2) details of the placement, including the names of those who conducted
medical assessments of the incarcerated individual, dates and times of placement, and the
date, if applicable, the incarcerated individual was released from restrictive housing; and
(3) any physical or mental effects on the incarcerated individual or fetus
resulting from the placement observed or reported by the person overseeing women’s health
and services in the facility.

HOUSE BILL 647
9–614.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Correctional unit” has the meaning stated in § 2–401 of this article.
(3) (i) “Restrictive housing” means a form of physical separation that
has not been requested by the incarcerated individual in which the incarcerated individual
is placed in a locked room or cell for [approximately 22] 17 hours or more out of a 24–hour
period OTHER THAN:
1. DURING A FACILITY–WIDE EMERGENCY; OR
2. FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING MEDICAL OR
MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT WITHIN A CLINICAL AREA OF THE FACILITY.
(ii) “Restrictive housing” includes administrative segregation and
disciplinary segregation.
9–614.1.
(a) In this section, “restrictive housing” has the meaning stated in § 9–614 of this
subtitle.
(b) This section applies to a facility operated by a correctional unit, as defined in
§ 2–401 of this article.
(c) A minor may not be placed in restrictive housing unless the managing official
of the facility finds by clear and convincing evidence that there is an immediate and
substantial risk:
(1) of physical harm to the minor, other incarcerated individuals, or staff;
or
(2) to the security of the facility.
(d) A minor placed in restrictive housing shall be provided:
(1) daily physical and mental health assessments to determine whether the
minor may be released from restrictive housing;
(2) the same standard of access that is provided to incarcerated individuals
not in restrictive housing to:
(i) phone calls;

HOUSE BILL 647 5
(ii) visits;
(iii) mail;
(iv) food;
(v) water;
(vi) showers;
(vii) sanitary supplies;
(viii) property, including clothing and bedding; and
(ix) medical, mental, and dental health care; and
(3) unless it would pose a risk of physical harm to the minor or another,
maximized access to recreation, education, and programming.
(e) If a privilege or condition described in subsection (d) of this section is not
provided to the minor, the managing official or the managing official’s designee shall record
the reason in the minor’s file.
SUBTITLE 10. RESTRICTIVE HOUSING.
10–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “MEMBER OF A VULNERABLE POPULATION” MEANS AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) IS 21 YEARS OLD OR YOUNGER;
(2) IS AT LEAST 55 YEARS OLD;
(3) HAS A DISABILITY BASED ON A MENTAL ILLNESS, HAS A HISTORY
OF PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION, OR HAS RECENTLY EXHIBITED CONDUCT,
INCLUDING SERIOUS SELF–MUTILATION, INDICATING THE NEED FOR FURTHER
OBSERVATION OR EVALUATION TO DETERMINE THE PRESENCE OF SERIOUS MENTAL
ILLNESS;
(4) HAS A DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY;

HOUSE BILL 647
(5) HAS A SERIOUS MEDICAL CONDITION THAT CANNOT EFFECTIVELY
BE TREATED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING;
(6) IS PREGNANT, IS FEWER THAN 45 DAYS POSTPARTUM, IS CARING
FOR A CHILD IN THE FACILITY UNDER § 9–601(I) OF THIS ARTICLE, OR HAS
RECENTLY SUFFERED A MISCARRIAGE OR TERMINATED A PREGNANCY;
(7) HAS A SIGNIFICANT AUDITORY OR VISUAL IMPAIRMENT; OR
(8) IS PERCEIVED TO BE LESBIAN, GAY, BISEXUAL, TRANSGENDER, OR
INTERSEX.
(C) “PROHIBITED ACT” INCLUDES:
(1) CAUSING OR ATTEMPTING TO CAUSE SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY
TO OR THE DEATH OF ANOTHER PERSON;
(2) MAKING AN IMMINENT THREAT OF SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY OR
DEATH TO ANOTHER PERSON WHEN:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL MAKING THE THREAT HAS A HISTORY OF
CAUSING PHYSICAL INJURY OR DEATH; AND
(II) THE COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION REASONABLY
DETERMINES THAT THERE IS A STRONG LIKELIHOOD THAT THE PERSON WILL CARRY
OUT A THREAT OF SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY OR DEATH;
(3) COMPELLING OR ATTEMPTING TO COMPEL ANOTHER PERSON, BY
FORCE OR THREAT OF FORCE, TO ENGAGE IN A SEXUAL ACT;
(4) EXTORTING ANOTHER, BY FORCE OR THREAT OF FORCE, FOR
PROPERTY OR MONEY;
(5) COERCING ANOTHER, BY FORCE OR THREAT OF FORCE, TO
VIOLATE A RULE;
(6) LEADING, ORGANIZING, INCITING, OR ATTEMPTING TO CAUSE A
RIOT, AN INSURRECTION, OR ANY OTHER SIMILARLY SERIOUS DISTURBANCE THAT
RESULTS IN THE TAKING OF A HOSTAGE, MAJOR PROPERTY DAMAGE, OR PHYSICAL
HARM TO ANOTHER PERSON;

HOUSE BILL 647 7
(7) PROCURING DEADLY WEAPONS OR OTHER DANGEROUS
CONTRABAND THAT POSE A SERIOUS THREAT TO THE SECURITY OF THE
INSTITUTION; AND
(8) ESCAPING, ATTEMPTING TO ESCAPE, OR FACILITATING AN
ESCAPE FROM A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR ESCAPING OR ATTEMPTING TO
ESCAPE WHILE UNDER SUPERVISION OUTSIDE A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(D) “RESTRICTIVE HOUSING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–614 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
10–1002.
(A) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT BE KEPT IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING FOR:
(I) LONGER THAN IS NECESSARY;
(II) LONGER THAN 15 CONSECUTIVE DAYS; AND
(III) MORE THAN 20 TOTAL DAYS IN ANY 60–DAY PERIOD.
(2) IF PLACEMENT OF AN INDIVIDUAL IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING
WOULD VIOLATE PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION, BUT THE DEPARTMENT
HAS FOUND THAT THE INDIVIDUAL HAS COMMITTED A PROHIBITED ACT, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY PLACE THE INDIVIDUAL IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING UNTIL THE
INDIVIDUAL CAN BE PLACED IN A RESIDENTIAL MENTAL HEALTH UNIT OR FOR 48
HOURS, WHICHEVER IS OF SHORTER DURATION.
(B) ALL RESTRICTIVE HOUSING UNITS SHALL CREATE THE LEAST
RESTRICTIVE ENVIRONMENT NECESSARY FOR THE SAFETY OF ALL INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS AND STAFF AND FOR THE SECURITY OF THE FACILITY.
10–1003.
NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 9–601.1 AND 9–614.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE, A MEMBER OF A VULNERABLE POPULATION MAY NOT BE PLACED IN
RESTRICTIVE HOUSING FOR ANY PERIOD OF TIME.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before October 1, 2027, and October 1, 2029, the Correctional
Ombudsman shall review the status of the implementation of this Act.

HOUSE BILL 647
(b) In conducting the reviews required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Correctional Ombudsman may:
(1) make unannounced visits to correctional facilities;
(2) review daily logs; and
(3) administer anonymous surveys.
(c) The Correctional Ombudsman shall include a summary of the results of the
reviews required under subsection (a) of this section in the annual reports required under
§ 9–4006 of the State Government Article to be submitted on or before December 31, 2027,
and December 31, 2029, respectively.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.